Hawaii, session 2026, HB2563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that cellphone use in schools can be detrimental to student achievement and wellbeing.  Research has shown that allowing cellphones in the classroom impacts student focus and engagement, leading to decreased academic performance on tests and adversely impacting students' long-term learning retention.  Excessive cellphone use can also distract students from in-person socialization, which is critical for students' physical and mental wellbeing. The legislature further finds that there is a growing number of states that are banning or restricting cellphone use in schools.  At least nineteen states have passed laws or enacted policies that ban or restrict students' use of cellphones in schools statewide or have recommended that local districts enact bans or restrictive policies.  In Hawaii, efforts to ban cellphones in schools have had a positive impact on students, with teachers reporting fewer distractions in class and more social interactions among students. The legislature declares that banning the use of cell phones and related devices, such as smart watches, earbuds, AirPods, Bluetooth connected headphones, and smart glasses, by students during school hours is a matter of statewide concern. The purpose of this Act is to require the board of education to adopt a policy that, beginning in the 2027-2028 school year, bans the use of cell phones and related devices, such as smart watches, earbuds, AirPods, Bluetooth connected headphones, and smart glasses, by students during school hours, except for instructional purposes. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Phone-and-related devices-free, bell-to-bell policy.  The board shall establish a phone-and-related devices- free, bell-to-bell policy for public schools to be implemented beginning with the 2027-2028 school year; provided that phones and related devices may be used for instructional purposes; provided further that the policy may be implemented in phases for each school level." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________